California statutes. Vehicle Code
(b) Each licensed renderer or collection center, or registered transporter, who refuses, upon demand of any peace officer or authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the Department of Food and Agriculture, to exhibit any record required by this article, or who destroys that record within two years after making the final entry of any information required by this article, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is punishable as follows:

(1) For a first offense, by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) For a second offense within a period of one year, by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In addition to any other punishment imposed pursuant to this paragraph, the court may enjoin the defendant from engaging in the business as a transporter, collection center, or renderer for a period not to exceed 30 days.

(3) For a third or any subsequent offense within a period of two years,
 by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In addition to any other sentence imposed pursuant to this paragraph, the court shall enjoin the defendant from engaging in the business as a transporter, collection center, or renderer for a period of 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 14.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2470.

It is unlawful for a person to engage in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease without being registered with the Department of Food and Agriculture and without being in possession of a valid registration certificate issued by that department, or a copy of the certificate, and a manifest for the inedible kitchen grease being transported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 15.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2472.

(a) It is unlawful for any person who is not a licensed renderer or collection center or registered transporter of inedible kitchen grease to transport that product from any place within this state to any place outside the borders of this state.

(b) It is unlawful for any person who is not a licensed renderer or collection center or registered transporter of inedible kitchen grease to transport that product from any place outside this state to any place inside the borders of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 16.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2474.

It is unlawful for any person to steal, misappropriate, contaminate, or damage inedible kitchen grease, or containers thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 394, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2476.

A licensed renderer or collection center, registered transporter, or any other person shall not take possession of inedible kitchen grease from an unregistered transporter, unlicensed renderer or collection center, or any other person, or knowingly take possession of stolen inedible kitchen grease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 17.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2478.

(a) Any person who is found guilty of violating Section 2470, 2472, 2474, or 2476, or the rules and regulations promulgated under those provisions, is subject to imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars
 ($5,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

(b) If the conviction is a second or subsequent conviction of a violation described in subdivision (a), or the violation is committed with intent to defraud or mislead, the person is subject to imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 303, Sec. 6.   (AB 2378)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2480.

(a) A peace officer may remove a vehicle, within the territorial limits in which the officer may act, if the vehicle is involved in the theft or movement of stolen inedible kitchen grease. If a peace officer removes a vehicle pursuant to this subdivision, the officer may, after citing or arresting the responsible person, seize the vehicle, which may be impounded for up to 15 days.

(b) The registered and legal owner of a vehicle removed and seized pursuant to subdivision (a) or their agents shall be provided the opportunity for a storage hearing to determine the validity of the storage in accordance with Section 22852.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22650) of Division 11 or any other law, an impounding agency shall release a motor vehicle to the registered owner or his or her agent prior to the conclusion of the impoundment period described in subdivision (a) under any of the following circumstances:

(A) If the vehicle is a stolen vehicle and reported as stolen in accordance with then existing state and local law.

(B) If the legal owner or registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car agency.

(C) If, prior to the conclusion of the impoundment period, a citation or notice is dismissed under Section 40500, criminal charges are not filed by the district attorney because of a lack of evidence, or the charges are otherwise dismissed by the court.

(2) A vehicle shall be released pursuant to this subdivision only if the registered owner or his or her agent presents a currently valid driver’s license to operate the vehicle and proof of current vehicle registration, or if ordered by a court.

(d) A vehicle seized and removed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be released to the legal owner of the vehicle, or the legal owner’s agent, on or before the 15th day of impoundment if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The legal owner is a motor vehicle dealer, bank, credit union, acceptance corporation, or other licensed financial institution legally operating in this state, or is another person, not the registered owner, holding a security interest in the vehicle.

(2) The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent pays all towing and storage fees
 related to the impoundment of the vehicle. No lien sale processing fees shall be charged to a legal owner who redeems the vehicle on or before the seventh day of impoundment.

(3) The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent presents foreclosure documents or an affidavit of repossession for the vehicle.

(e) (1) The registered owner or his or her agent is responsible for all towing and storage charges related to the impoundment, and any administrative charges authorized under Section 22850.5.

(2) If the vehicle is a rental vehicle, the rental car agency may require the person to whom the vehicle was rented to pay all towing and storage charges related to the impoundment and any administrative charges authorized under Section 22850.5 incurred by the rental car agency in connection with obtaining
 possession of the vehicle.

(3) The owner is not liable for any towing and storage charges related to the impoundment if acquittal or dismissal occurs.

(4) The vehicle shall not be sold prior to the defendant’s conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 532.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2482.

(a) To assist law enforcement personnel in enforcing this article, each vehicle transporting inedible kitchen grease shall have a current registration decal issued by the Department of Food and Agriculture permanently affixed and prominently displayed on the upper right corner of the vehicle windshield or in a conspicuous location on the right side of the trailer being towed.

(b) Each vehicle used in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease shall conspicuously display the following information on both front doors of the vehicle in letters not less than two inches high:

(1) The name of the business or person registered as a transporter
 with the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(2) The address of the company or owner, or the carrier identification number issued by the California Highway Patrol.

(c) Removable signs shall also display the information specified in subdivision (b).

(d) A violation of this section shall be a correctable offense pursuant to Section 40303.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 19.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Licenses Issued by California Highway Patrol [2500. - 2574.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2500. - 2505.]

2500.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all licenses issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol unless the particular provisions applicable to each license otherwise provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

(a) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol may issue licenses for the operation of privately owned or operated ambulances used to respond to emergency calls, armored cars, fleet owner inspection and maintenance stations, and for the transportation of hazardous material, including the transportation of explosives. Licenses issued under this section shall be issued in accordance with this chapter and regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant thereto. Licenses issued by the commissioner shall expire one year from the date of issue, and may be renewed upon application and payment of the renewal fees if the application for renewal is made within the 30-day period before the date of expiration. A person whose license has expired shall immediately cease the activity requiring a license, but the commissioner shall accept
 applications for renewal during the 30-day period following the date of expiration if they are accompanied by the new license fee. A license shall not be renewed when the application is received more than 30 days after the date of expiration.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and this chapter, licenses shall not be required under this chapter for ambulances owned or operated by a fire department of a federally recognized tribe or operators of those ambulances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 282, Sec. 2.   (AB 798)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each application for a new or renewal license shall be accompanied by a fee of ten dollars ($10) for a new license or five dollars ($5) for a renewal license. This subdivision does not apply to licenses for transportation of hazardous material or operation of ambulances.

(b) Each application for a new or renewal license for the operation of ambulances shall be accompanied by a fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for a new license or one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for a renewal license.

(c) Each application for a new or renewal license to transport hazardous material shall be accompanied by a fee of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for a new license and not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) for a renewal license.

(d) Each application shall be made upon a form furnished by the commissioner. It shall contain information concerning the applicant’s background and experience which the commissioner may prescribe, in addition to other information required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 539, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.

(a) Licenses issued by the commissioner shall not be transferable. A change in ownership or control of the licensed activity shall render the existing license null and void and a new license shall be required. A change in ownership or control includes, but is not limited to, a change in corporate status, or a stock transfer of shares possessing more than 50 percent of the voting power of the corporation. A change in ownership or control does not include the addition or deletion of partners, officers, directors, or board members comprising 50 percent or less ownership or control of the licensed activity if both of the following are complied with:

(1) The new partners, officers, directors, or board members have not committed any acts described in Section 2541.

(2) An amended license application form indicating the changes and any other information required pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2502 is submitted to the commissioner within 10 days of the change.

(b) In the event of a change of name, not involving a change of ownership or control, the license shall be returned to the commissioner for cancellation, and a new license application form shall be submitted. The commissioner shall cancel the returned license and issue a new license for the unexpired term without a fee.

(c) In the event of loss, destruction, or mutilation of a license issued by the commissioner, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a duplicate upon paying a fee of five dollars ($5). Any person who loses a license issued by the commissioner and who, after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original license, shall immediately surrender the original license to the commissioner.

(d) Any change of address or relocation of a licensed service shall be reported to the commissioner within 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1008, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2504.

It is unlawful to violate any regulation adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

2505.

Notwithstanding Sections 2501 and 2502, for the purpose of staggering license renewals subject to this chapter, the commissioner may, during any 12-month period, issue licenses that expire 6 to 18 months from the date of issue. Subsequent renewal of these licenses shall be for a period of 12 months. Fees with respect to these licenses for more or less than one year shall be prorated accordingly.

This section applies only to licenses for the transportation of hazardous materials established on or after January 1, 1982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1230, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Privately Owned and Operated Ambulances and Armored Cars [2510. - 2512.]

2510.

(a) (1) A person applying for a license to operate ambulances or armored cars shall provide separate identification data and reports of inspection for each vehicle as prescribed by the commissioner.

(2) A person who operates ambulances owned or operated by a fire department of a federally recognized Indian tribe shall be exempt from the requirements set forth under paragraph (1) and this chapter.

(b) (1) A person shall not operate a privately owned emergency ambulance or armored car until the California Highway Patrol has determined that the vehicle is in compliance with this code and regulations adopted by the
 commissioner. Ambulances licensed by the department shall be inspected by the department not less often than once annually.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department shall not inspect ambulances owned or operated by a fire department of a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 282, Sec. 3.   (AB 798)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2511.

Licenses for the operation of ambulances may be issued only to those persons or entities which operate ambulances designed and operated exclusively as such and which are used to respond to emergency calls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

2512.

(a) The commissioner, after consultation with, and pursuant to the recommendations of, the Emergency Medical Service Authority and the department, shall adopt and enforce reasonable regulations as the commissioner determines are necessary for the public health and safety regarding the operation, equipment, and certification of drivers of all ambulances used for emergency services. The regulations shall not conflict with standards established by the Emergency Medical Service Authority pursuant to Section 1797.170 of the Health and Safety Code. The commissioner shall exempt, upon request of the county board of supervisors that an exemption is necessary for public health and safety, noncommercial ambulances operated within the county from the regulations adopted under this section as are specified in the board of supervisors’ request. The Emergency Medical Service Authority shall be notified by the county boards of supervisors of any exemptions.

(b) The department, in cooperation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the Emergency Medical Service Authority, may adopt and administer regulations relating to the issuance, suspension, or revocation of ambulance driver’s certificates. In addition to the fee authorized in Section 2427, the department shall charge a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for the issuance of an original certificate and twelve dollars ($12) for the renewal of that certificate, and, in the administration thereof, to exercise the powers granted to the commissioner by this section.

(c) This section shall not preclude the adoption of more restrictive regulations by local authorities, except that inspection of ambulances pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2510 shall not be duplicated by local authorities. It is the intent of the Legislature that regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be the minimum necessary to protect public health and safety, and shall not be so restrictive as to preclude compliance by ambulances operated in sparsely populated areas. This subdivision does not relieve the owner or driver of any ambulance from compliance with Section 21055.

(d) The Department of the California Highway Patrol after consultation with the department and the Emergency Medical Service Authority shall prepare, and make available for purchase, an ambulance driver’s handbook.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 440, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Inspection and Maintenance Stations [2525. - 2525.12.]

2525.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Fleet owner” means an owner of a fleet of three or more vehicles that are any one or more of the types specified in Section 34500 who is engaged in the transportation of persons or property and whose vehicles are registered in California.

(b) “Inspection and maintenance station” means a facility operated by a fleet owner to inspect and maintain his own vehicles and licensed by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.2.

The commissioner may adopt such regulations as are necessary to administer the provisions of this article. A fleet owner licensed by the commissioner as an inspection and maintenance station pursuant to this chapter shall comply with such regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.4.

(a) Fleet owners licensed as inspection and maintenance stations shall do all of the following:

(1) Conduct all installations, adjustments, inspections, and maintenance under the supervision of, and subject to the regulations of, the department, and subject to Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000).

(2) If engaged in interstate transportation, also conduct inspections and maintenance in accordance with the requirements of the United States Department of Transportation.

(3) If operating or maintaining vehicles described in subdivisions (a), (b), (d), (e), (f), or (g), of Section 34500, enroll
 each licensed inspection and maintenance station for inspection by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 34501.12 and pay the fees required by subdivision (e) of that section.

(b) Fleet owners may not certify vehicle safety systems, as described in Section 9888.5 of the Business and Professions Code, or the installation, inspection, repair, or servicing of motor vehicle pollution control devices or systems, except for vehicles in the owner’s fleet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 23.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.6.

Each fleet owner licensed as an inspection and maintenance station may place upon a vehicle which it has inspected and maintained, or upon which it has installed or adjusted required equipment, a sticker, in a form approved by the commissioner, certifying the compliance of such vehicle with all pertinent requirements imposed upon such vehicle by this code or regulations adopted thereunder and, if applicable, by the United States Department of Transportation. Such stickers shall remain valid for a period of one year and shall not be placed on any vehicle which is not part of the fleet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.8.

The commissioner shall make and enforce regulations with respect to the issuance of stickers to be displayed upon vehicles owned or operated by a fleet owner which has complied with Section 2525.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.10.

It is unlawful and constitutes a separate offense for any person to knowingly place or knowingly permit to be placed any sticker authorized by this article on any vehicle which does not comply with all the equipment requirements of this code or regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.12.

The commissioner may charge a fee for the stickers furnished to fleet owner inspection and maintenance stations. The fee charged shall be established by regulation and shall not produce a total estimated revenue which, together with license fees charged pursuant to Sections 2502 and 2503, is in excess of the estimated total cost to the department of the administration of the statutes relating to fleet owner inspection and maintenance stations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Transportation of Hazardous Material [2531. - 2532.]

2531.

In addition to taking action pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 2540), the commissioner may deny, suspend, or revoke a license to transport hazardous material when it is evident that the applicant or licensee or his or her employees have repeatedly violated any provision of law to such an extent as to demonstrate that it would be unsafe and not in the public interest to permit the applicant or licensee to operate or permit the operation of any vehicle owned or controlled by him or her for the transportation of hazardous material upon the public highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.

The commissioner may adopt such regulations as are necessary to administer the provisions of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 860, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Denial, Suspension and Revocation [2540. - 2549.]

2540.

Any license issued may be suspended or revoked by the commissioner. The commissioner may refuse to issue a license to any applicant for the reasons set forth in Section 2531 or 2541. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 860, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.

(a) The commissioner may deny a license if the applicant or any partner, officer, or director thereof:

(1) Fails to meet the qualifications established by the department pursuant to this chapter for the issuance of the license applied for.

(2) Was previously the holder of a license issued under this chapter which license has been revoked and never reissued or which license was suspended and the terms of the suspension have not been fulfilled.

(3) Has committed any act which, if committed by any licensee, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a license issued pursuant to this chapter. 

(4) Has committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit whereby another is injured or whereby the applicant has benefited.

(5) Has acted in the capacity of a licensed person or firm under this chapter without having a license therefor.

(6) Has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of, or been convicted of, a felony, or a crime involving moral turpitude, and the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, irrespective of an order granting probation following such conviction, suspending the imposition of sentence, or of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the plea or verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation or information.

(b) The commissioner may also deny a license if a corporation is the applicant and the policy or activities of the corporation are or will be directed, controlled, or managed by individuals or shareholders who are ineligible for a license, and the licensing of that corporation would likely defeat the purpose of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 16, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2542.

The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or take other disciplinary action against a license as provided in this article if the licensee or any partner, officer, director, controlling shareholder, or manager thereof:

(a) Violates any section of this code which relates to his or her licensed activities.

(b) Is convicted of any felony.

(c) Is convicted of any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude.

(d) Violates any of the regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Commits any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit whereby another is injured or any act involving moral turpitude.

(f) Has misrepresented a material fact in obtaining a license.

(g) Aids or abets an unlicensed person to evade this chapter.

(h) Fails to make and keep records showing his or her transactions as a licensee, or fails to have these records available for inspection by the commissioner or his or her duly authorized representative for a period of not less than three years after completion of any transaction to which the records refer, or refuses to comply with a written request of the commissioner to make such record available for inspection.

(i) Violates or attempts to violate this chapter relating to the particular activity for which he or she is licensed.

(j) Fails to equip or maintain his or her vehicles, as required by this code or by the regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 161, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2543.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The commissioner may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

2544.

The commissioner may take disciplinary action against any licensee after a hearing as provided in this chapter by any of the following:

(a) Imposing probation upon terms and conditions to be set forth by the commissioner.

(b) Suspending the license.

(c) Revoking the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

2545.

Upon the effective date of any order of suspension or revocation of any license governed by this chapter, the licensee shall surrender the license to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

2546.

The expiration or suspension of a license by operation of law or by order or decision of the commissioner or a court of law, or the voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee shall not deprive the commissioner of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation of or action or disciplinary proceedings against such licensee, or to render a decision suspending or revoking such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

2547.

All accusations against licensees shall be filed within three years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, except that with respect to an accusation alleging a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 2542, the accusation may be filed within two years after the discovery by the California Highway Patrol of the alleged facts constituting the fraud or misrepresentation prohibited by said section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

2548.

When any license has been revoked or suspended following a hearing under the provisions of this chapter, any additional license issued under this chapter in the name of the licensee may be likewise revoked or suspended by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

2549.

After suspension of the license upon any of the grounds set forth in this article, the commissioner may reinstate the license upon proof of compliance by the applicant with all provisions of the decision as to reinstatement. After revocation of a license upon any of the grounds set forth in this article, the license shall not be reinstated or reissued within a period of one year after the effective date of revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transportation of School Pupils [2570. - 2574.]

2570.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, that the public be provided additional protection through the licensing of private schoolbus contractors transporting school pupils under contracts with school districts, and that the Department of the California Highway Patrol be authorized to inspect and license the contractors described in subdivision (a), giving special attention directed to negligent operators or repeat violators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 3.6.)
-------------------------------------------

2571.

Every private schoolbus contractor who contracts with a school district for the transportation of school pupils shall be licensed in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. The license fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for an initial license and seventy-five dollars ($75) for each annual renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 3.6.)
-------------------------------------------

2572.

(a) The commissioner may adopt whatever regulations are necessary to administer this chapter. The regulations shall be consistent with regulations regarding schoolbuses and schoolbus drivers adopted by the commissioner pursuant to other provisions of law.

(b) In addition to any other requirements, it is unlawful for the private schoolbus contractor or the person who directs the driver to operate a vehicle transporting school pupils, when that transportation requires a license, to knowingly cause the operation of the vehicle unless the private schoolbus contractor holds a valid license for the transportation of school pupils. A violation of this subdivision shall be punished by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 3.6.)
-------------------------------------------

2573.

(a) The commissioner may temporarily suspend a license to transport school pupils under contract with a school district, subject to a hearing conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, when, in the commissioner’s opinion, the action is necessary to prevent an imminent and substantial danger to the public health.

(b) The commissioner may, following a hearing, suspend a license to transport school pupils under contract with a school district, for a period of at least 30 days but not more than 90 days, if the holder of the license knowingly permits the transportation of school pupils by a person who does not possess the appropriate driver’s license and driver’s certificate.

(c) The suspensions authorized pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) may, at the discretion of the commissioner, be enforced for all operations of a schoolbus contractor, or for the operations of the contractor in the school district in which the alleged violations occurred, or for the operations of the contractor in the contractor’s terminal in which the alleged violations occurred.

(d) The commissioner shall provide notification of a suspension hearing to those school districts whose terminals would be affected by the suspension.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 3.6.)
-------------------------------------------

2574.

(a) All fees collected by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to the issuance or renewal of a license for the transportation of school pupils under contract with a school district shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account of the State Transportation Fund.

(b) All moneys collected from these fees shall be used for the support of the licensing program of the department upon appropriation therefor by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 3.6.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Administration and Enforcement [2800. - 2818.]



  ARTICLE 1. Lawful Orders and Inspections [2800. - 2818.]

2800.

(a) It is unlawful to willfully fail or refuse to comply with a lawful order, signal, or direction of a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, when that peace officer is in uniform and is performing duties pursuant to any of the provisions of this code, or to refuse to submit to a lawful inspection pursuant to this code.

(b) (1) Except as authorized pursuant to Section 24004, it is unlawful to fail or refuse to comply with a lawful out-of-service order issued by an authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or by an authorized enforcement officer as described in
 subdivision (d).

(2) It is unlawful for a driver transporting hazardous materials in a commercial motor vehicle that is required to display a placard pursuant to Section 27903 to violate paragraph (1).

(3) It is unlawful for a driver of a vehicle designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver, to violate paragraph (1).

(c) It is unlawful to fail or refuse to comply with a lawful out-of-service order issued by the United States Secretary of the Department of Transportation.

(d) “Out-of-Service order” means a declaration by an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local jurisdiction that a driver, a
 commercial motor vehicle, or a motor carrier operation is out-of-service pursuant to Section 386.72, 392.5, 392.9a, 395.13, or 396.9 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations, state law, or the North American Standard Out-of-Service Criteria.

(e) It is unlawful for a driver of a commercial vehicle subject to inspection under this code to fail to comply with any vehicle inspection testing and associated procedures as required by an authorized member of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 3.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.1.

(a) Any person who, while operating a motor vehicle and with the intent to evade, willfully flees or otherwise attempts to elude a pursuing peace officer’s motor vehicle, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The peace officer’s motor vehicle is exhibiting at least one lighted red lamp visible from the front and the person either sees or reasonably should have seen the lamp.

(2) The peace officer’s motor vehicle is sounding a siren as may be reasonably necessary.

(3) The peace officer’s motor vehicle is distinctively marked.

(4) The peace officer’s motor vehicle is operated by a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, and that peace officer is wearing a distinctive uniform.

(b) Any person who, while operating a motor vehicle and with the intent to evade, willfully flees or otherwise attempts to elude a pursuing peace officer’s bicycle, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year if the following conditions exist:

(1) The peace officer’s bicycle is distinctively marked.

(2) The peace officer’s bicycle is operated by a peace officer, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), and that peace officer is wearing a distinctive uniform.

(3) The peace officer gives a verbal command to stop.

(4) The peace officer sounds a horn that produces a sound of at least 115 decibels.

(5) The peace officer gives a hand signal commanding the person to stop.

(6) The person is aware or reasonably should have been aware of the verbal command, horn, and hand signal, but refuses to comply with the command to stop.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 485, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.2.

(a) If a person flees or attempts to elude a pursuing peace officer in violation of Section 2800.1 and the pursued vehicle is driven in a willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property, the person driving the vehicle, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison, or by confinement in the county jail for not less than six months nor more than one year. The court may also impose a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or may impose both that imprisonment or confinement and fine.

(b) For purposes of this section, a willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property includes, but is not limited to, driving while fleeing or attempting to elude a pursuing peace officer during which time either three or more violations that are assigned a traffic violation point count under Section 12810 occur, or damage to property occurs.
